District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-825.01

Board of Real Property Assessments and Appeals.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 3, 1974, Pub. L. 93-407, title IV, § 426a
as added Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-241, § 2(e), 40 DCR 629
Sept. 30, 1993, D.C. Law 10-25, § 103, 40 DCR 5489
Mar. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-98, § 2, 41 DCR 531
June 14, 1994, D.C. Law 10-127, § 5(f), 41 DCR 2050
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255,§ 42, 41 DCR 5193
Mar. 29, 1996, D.C. Law 11-109, § 2, 43 DCR 526
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 53, 43 DCR 530
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-194, § 2, 43 DCR 4557
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
May 22, 1997, D.C. Law 11-269, §§ 2(a), (b), 43 DCR 6868
Oct. 23, 1997, D.C. Law 12-40, § 101(e), 44 DCR 4859
Mar. 7, 2000, D.C. Law 13-55, § 2, 46 DCR 8868
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2405, 47 DCR 6308
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 502(r), 48 DCR 334
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313, § 16(a), 48 DCR 1873
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 2002(f), 48 DCR 6981
Oct. 26, 2001, D.C. Law 14-42, § 10(d), 48 DCR 7612
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 11(h), 50 DCR 896
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 1303(c), 49 DCR 11664
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 26(c)(3), 51 DCR 881
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 1162(a), 51 DCR 8441
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(b)(3), 52 DCR 2638
Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-159, § 2(b), 53 DCR 5385
Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-216,§ 4(c), 55 DCR 7500
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 7015, 55 DCR 7598
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 121, 56 DCR 1117
April 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-363, § 2(b)(2), 58 DCR 963

Cross References

District of Columbia administration, board and commission members, compensation, see § 1-611.08.
Nominees and candidates for public office, disclosure of conflicts of interest, see § 1-1106.02.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-820, § 47-824, § 47-825.01a, § 47-825.02, § 47-825.03, § 47-831, § 47-845.01, § 47-893, and § 47-1005.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-825.1.

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 18-363, which took effect on April 8, 2011, included a repeal of this section. D.C. Act 19-33, which went into effect on March 15, 2011, and D.C. Acts 19-76, 19-169, 19-256, and D.C. Laws 19-9, 19-75, and D.C. Law 19-155 delayed the applicability of D.C. Law 18-363 until August 24, 2012.

Applicability of D.C. Law 18-363: Section 3a of D.C. Law 18-363, as added by D.C. Law 19-155, § 4, provided: “Sec. 3a. Applicability; transition.

“(a) Sections 2 and 3 shall apply upon Council approval and appointment by the Mayor of a full-time Chairperson and a full-time Vice Chairperson to the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia.

“(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor shall appoint the members of the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia with the advice and consent of the Council in accordance with the provisions of section 2(b)(3).”

On August 24, 2012, the repeal of this section went into effect pursuant to D.C. Law 18-363, § 2(b), D.C. Law 19-155, § 4, D.C. Resolutions 19-479 and 19-488, effective July 10, 2012 ( 59 DCR 9169 and 59 DCR 9178, respectively), and Mayor’s Order 2012-135, dated August 24, 2012. Accordingly, this section was repealed as of August 24, 2012.

Section 114(a) of D.C. Law 19-171, effective September 26, 2012, purported to amend this section; however, the section was, and remains, repealed.